Illinois, session 104th, SB1360.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-45.62 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.62 new)7    Sec. 5-45.62. Emergency rulemaking; public safety radio 8interoperability grants. To provide for the expeditious and 9timely implementation of the changes made by this amendatory 10Act of the 104th General Assembly, emergency rules 11implementing the changes made by this amendatory Act of the 12104th General Assembly may be adopted in accordance with 13Section 5-45 by the Illinois State Police and the Illinois 14Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security. 15The adoption of emergency rules authorized by Section 5-45 and 16this Section is deemed to be necessary for the public 17interest, safety, and welfare.18    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 19of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 20    Section 10. The Illinois State Police Radio Act is amended 21by changing Section 10 as follows:   SB1360- 2 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1    (20 ILCS 2615/10)2    Sec. 10. Public safety radio interoperability. 3    (a) The General Assembly finds that:4        (1) Reliable, timely communications among public 5    safety responders and between public safety agencies and 6    citizens is critical to effectively protect public safety 7    in Illinois.8        (2) Because of overlapping jurisdiction of public 9    safety agencies and convergent coverage of public safety 10    communications systems and networks, oversight regarding 11    the interoperability of Illinois' land mobile radio 12    communication systems is necessary and in the public 13    interest.14    (b) In this Section, "interoperability" means the ability 15of emergency response providers and relevant government 16officials to communicate across jurisdictions, disciplines, 17and levels of government as needed and as authorized.18    (c) The Upon their establishment and thereafter, the 19Director of the Illinois State Police, or his or her designee, 20shall serve as the chairman of the Illinois Statewide 21Interoperability Executive Committee (SIEC). The SIEC shall 22oversee advisory boards in the governance, interoperability, 23and land mobile radio standards for Illinois' land mobile 24radio communications system and shall collaborate with the 25Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator and the Homeland 26Security Advisory Council to strengthen Illinois' emergency   SB1360- 3 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1communications ecosystem and as the chairman of the STARCOM21 2Oversight Committee. The Director or his or her designee, as 3chairman, may increase the size and makeup of the voting 4membership of the SIEC each committee when deemed necessary 5for improved public safety radio interoperability, but the 6voting membership of each committee must represent public 7safety users (police, fire, or EMS) and must, at a minimum, 8include the Statewide Interoperability Coordinator, the 9Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, the Director of the Secretary 10of State Police or Director's designee, and at least one 11representative from each of the following, appointed by the 12Governor: an association representing Illinois fire chiefs, an 13association representing Illinois fire protection districts, 14the Office of the State Fire Marshal, an association 15representing Illinois chiefs of police, an association 16representing Illinois sheriffs, the Illinois State Police, the 17Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 18Security, the Department of Public Health, the Department of 19Innovation and Technology, and the Department of Military 20Affairs representatives specified in this Section.21    The advisory boards of the SIEC shall include, but are not 22limited to, the Governance Advisory Board, which shall be 23cochaired by the Statewide Interoperability Coordinator and 24the Director of the Illinois State Police or the Director's 25designee; the Statewide Interoperability Advisory Board, which 26shall be chaired by the Statewide Interoperability   SB1360- 4 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1Coordinator; and the STARCOM21 Advisory Board, which shall be 2chaired by the Director of the Illinois State Police or the 3Director's designee. The members of the advisory boards 4STARCOM21 Oversight Committee must comprise public safety 5users accessing the system and shall include the Statewide 6Interoperability Coordinator. The members of the STARCOM21 7Oversight Committee shall serve without compensation and may, 8at the call of the Chair, meet in person or remotely. The SIEC 9shall adopt bylaws for its effective operation, as well as 10that of its advisory boards, and may appoint advisors from the 11public safety communications community to serve on its 12advisory boards at the pleasure of the SIEC. The Illinois 13State Police shall provide administrative and other support to 14the SIEC and its advisory boards STARCOM21 Oversight 15Committee.16     (d) The SIEC STARCOM21 Oversight Committee shall:17        (1) no later than the July 1, 2026, establish:18            (A) standards necessary to ensure land mobile 19        radio equipment interoperates throughout Illinois. 20        Compliance with these standards shall be implemented 21        as funding becomes available;22            (B) planning, training, and evaluation standards 23        necessary to enhance public safety communications 24        operational readiness; and25            (C) standards necessary for the unification of the 26        Integrated Public Alert and Warning System statewide   SB1360- 5 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1        review existing statutory law and make recommendations 2        for legislative changes to ensure efficient, 3        effective, reliable, and sustainable radio 4        interoperability statewide;5        (2) no later than July 1, 2026, develop and recommend 6    a plan to sustainably fund radio infrastructure, radio 7    equipment, and interoperability statewide make 8    recommendations concerning better integration of the 9    Integrated Public Alert and Warning System statewide; and10        (3) annually review existing statutory law and make 11    recommendations for legislative changes to ensure 12    efficient, effective, reliable, and sustainable land 13    mobile radio interoperability statewide develop a plan to 14    sustainably fund radio infrastructure, radio equipment, 15    and interoperability statewide.16    (e) The Illinois State Police, subject to the approval of 17the SIEC, may use any money appropriated to it for the purpose 18of promoting public safety radio interoperability if the use 19of the funds is consistent with any standards set forth by the 20SIEC. The Illinois State Police may, on its own or jointly with 21the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 22Homeland Security, adopt emergency rules under the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act or any other rules necessary to 24implement the provisions of this Section. 25    The SIEC shall have at a minimum one representative from 26each of the following: the Illinois Fire Chiefs Association,   SB1360- 6 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1the Rural Fire Protection Association, the Office of the State 2Fire Marshal, the Illinois Association of Chiefs of Police, 3the Illinois Sheriffs' Association, the Illinois State Police, 4the Illinois Emergency Management Agency, the Department of 5Public Health, and the Secretary of State Police (which 6representative shall be the Director of the Secretary of State 7Police or his or her designee).8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-34, eff. 6-9-23.) 9    Section 15. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 10is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 11    (20 ILCS 3305/5)12    Sec. 5. Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 13Homeland Security. 14    (a) There is created within the executive branch of the 15State Government an Illinois Emergency Management Agency and a 16Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency, herein 17called the "Director" who shall be the head thereof. The 18Director shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice 19and consent of the Senate, and shall serve for a term of 2 20years beginning on the third Monday in January of the 21odd-numbered year, and until a successor is appointed and has 22qualified; except that the term of the first Director 23appointed under this Act shall expire on the third Monday in 24January, 1989. The Director shall not hold any other   SB1360- 7 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1remunerative public office. For terms beginning after January 218, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1179) and 3before January 16, 2023, the annual salary of the Director 4shall be as provided in Section 5-300 of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois. Notwithstanding any other 6provision of law, for terms beginning on or after January 16, 72023, the Director shall receive an annual salary of $180,000 8or as set by the Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 92023, and on each July 1 thereafter, the Director shall 10receive an increase in salary based on a cost of living 11adjustment as authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 1286th General Assembly. 13    For terms beginning on or after January 16, 2023, the 14Assistant Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 15shall receive an annual salary of $156,600 or as set by the 16Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 2023, and on each 17July 1 thereafter, the Assistant Director shall receive an 18increase in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as 19authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General 20Assembly. 21    (b) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall obtain, 22under the provisions of the Personnel Code, technical, 23clerical, stenographic and other administrative personnel, and 24may make expenditures within the appropriation therefor as may 25be necessary to carry out the purpose of this Act. The agency 26created by this Act is intended to be a successor to the agency   SB1360- 8 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1created under the Illinois Emergency Services and Disaster 2Agency Act of 1975 and the personnel, equipment, records, and 3appropriations of that agency are transferred to the successor 4agency as of June 30, 1988 (the effective date of this Act).5    (c) The Director, subject to the direction and control of 6the Governor, shall be the executive head of the Illinois 7Emergency Management Agency and the State Emergency Response 8Commission and shall be responsible under the direction of the 9Governor, for carrying out the program for emergency 10management of this State. The Director shall also maintain 11liaison and cooperate with the emergency management 12organizations of this State and other states and of the 13federal government.14    (d) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall take an 15integral part in the development and revision of political 16subdivision emergency operations plans prepared under 17paragraph (f) of Section 10. To this end it shall employ or 18otherwise secure the services of professional and technical 19personnel capable of providing expert assistance to the 20emergency services and disaster agencies. These personnel 21shall consult with emergency services and disaster agencies on 22a regular basis and shall make field examinations of the 23areas, circumstances, and conditions that particular political 24subdivision emergency operations plans are intended to apply.25    (e) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and political 26subdivisions shall be encouraged to form an emergency   SB1360- 9 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1management advisory committee composed of private and public 2personnel representing the emergency management phases of 3mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. The Local 4Emergency Planning Committee, as created under the Illinois 5Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act, shall 6serve as an advisory committee to the emergency services and 7disaster agency or agencies serving within the boundaries of 8that Local Emergency Planning Committee planning district for:9        (1) the development of emergency operations plan 10    provisions for hazardous chemical emergencies; and11        (2) the assessment of emergency response capabilities 12    related to hazardous chemical emergencies.13    (f) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall:14        (1) Coordinate the overall emergency management 15    program of the State.16        (2) Cooperate with local governments, the federal 17    government, and any public or private agency or entity in 18    achieving any purpose of this Act and in implementing 19    emergency management programs for mitigation, 20    preparedness, response, and recovery.21        (2.5) Develop a comprehensive emergency preparedness 22    and response plan for any nuclear accident in accordance 23    with Section 65 of the Nuclear Safety Law of 2004 and in 24    development of the Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness 25    program in accordance with Section 8 of the Illinois 26    Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act.  SB1360- 10 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1        (2.6) Coordinate with the Department of Public Health 2    with respect to planning for and responding to public 3    health emergencies.4        (3) Prepare, for issuance by the Governor, executive 5    orders, proclamations, and regulations as necessary or 6    appropriate in coping with disasters.7        (4) Promulgate rules and requirements for political 8    subdivision emergency operations plans that are not 9    inconsistent with and are at least as stringent as 10    applicable federal laws and regulations.11        (5) Review and approve, in accordance with Illinois 12    Emergency Management Agency rules, emergency operations 13    plans for those political subdivisions required to have an 14    emergency services and disaster agency pursuant to this 15    Act.16        (5.5) Promulgate rules and requirements for the 17    political subdivision emergency management exercises, 18    including, but not limited to, exercises of the emergency 19    operations plans.20        (5.10) Review, evaluate, and approve, in accordance 21    with Illinois Emergency Management Agency rules, political 22    subdivision emergency management exercises for those 23    political subdivisions required to have an emergency 24    services and disaster agency pursuant to this Act.25        (6) Determine requirements of the State and its 26    political subdivisions for food, clothing, and other   SB1360- 11 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1    necessities in event of a disaster.2        (7) Establish a register of persons with types of 3    emergency management training and skills in mitigation, 4    preparedness, response, and recovery. 5        (8) Establish a register of government and private 6    response resources available for use in a disaster.7        (9) Expand the Earthquake Awareness Program and its 8    efforts to distribute earthquake preparedness materials to 9    schools, political subdivisions, community groups, civic 10    organizations, and the media. Emphasis will be placed on 11    those areas of the State most at risk from an earthquake. 12    Maintain the list of all school districts, hospitals, 13    airports, power plants, including nuclear power plants, 14    lakes, dams, emergency response facilities of all types, 15    and all other major public or private structures which are 16    at the greatest risk of damage from earthquakes under 17    circumstances where the damage would cause subsequent harm 18    to the surrounding communities and residents.19        (10) Disseminate all information, completely and 20    without delay, on water levels for rivers and streams and 21    any other data pertaining to potential flooding supplied 22    by the Division of Water Resources within the Department 23    of Natural Resources to all political subdivisions to the 24    maximum extent possible.25        (11) Develop agreements, if feasible, with medical 26    supply and equipment firms to supply resources as are   SB1360- 12 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1    necessary to respond to an earthquake or any other 2    disaster as defined in this Act. These resources will be 3    made available upon notifying the vendor of the disaster. 4    Payment for the resources will be in accordance with 5    Section 7 of this Act. The Illinois Department of Public 6    Health shall determine which resources will be required 7    and requested.8        (11.5) In coordination with the Illinois State Police, 9    develop and implement a community outreach program to 10    promote awareness among the State's parents and children 11    of child abduction prevention and response.12        (12) Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, 13    award capital and non-capital grants to Illinois hospitals 14    or health care facilities located outside of a city with a 15    population in excess of 1,000,000 to be used for purposes 16    that include, but are not limited to, preparing to respond 17    to mass casualties and disasters, maintaining and 18    improving patient safety and quality of care, and 19    protecting the confidentiality of patient information. No 20    single grant for a capital expenditure shall exceed 21    $300,000. No single grant for a non-capital expenditure 22    shall exceed $100,000. In awarding such grants, preference 23    shall be given to hospitals that serve a significant 24    number of Medicaid recipients, but do not qualify for 25    disproportionate share hospital adjustment payments under 26    the Illinois Public Aid Code. To receive such a grant, a   SB1360- 13 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1    hospital or health care facility must provide funding of 2    at least 50% of the cost of the project for which the grant 3    is being requested. In awarding such grants the Illinois 4    Emergency Management Agency shall consider the 5    recommendations of the Illinois Hospital Association.6        (13) Do all other things necessary, incidental or 7    appropriate for the implementation of this Act.8    (g) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is authorized 9to make grants to various higher education institutions, 10public K-12 school districts, area vocational centers as 11designated by the State Board of Education, inter-district 12special education cooperatives, regional safe schools, and 13nonpublic K-12 schools for safety and security improvements. 14For the purpose of this subsection (g), "higher education 15institution" means a public university, a public community 16college, or an independent, not-for-profit or for-profit 17higher education institution located in this State. Grants 18made under this subsection (g) shall be paid out of moneys 19appropriated for that purpose from the Build Illinois Bond 20Fund. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall adopt 21rules to implement this subsection (g). These rules may 22specify: (i) the manner of applying for grants; (ii) project 23eligibility requirements; (iii) restrictions on the use of 24grant moneys; (iv) the manner in which the various higher 25education institutions must account for the use of grant 26moneys; and (v) any other provision that the Illinois   SB1360- 14 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1Emergency Management Agency determines to be necessary or 2useful for the administration of this subsection (g).3    (g-5) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is 4authorized to make grants to not-for-profit organizations 5which are exempt from federal income taxation under section 6501(c)(3) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code for eligible 7security improvements that assist the organization in 8preventing, preparing for, or responding to threats, attacks, 9or acts of terrorism. To be eligible for a grant under the 10program, the Agency must determine that the organization is at 11a high risk of being subject to threats, attacks, or acts of 12terrorism based on the organization's profile, ideology, 13mission, or beliefs. Eligible security improvements shall 14include all eligible preparedness activities under the federal 15Nonprofit Security Grant Program, including, but not limited 16to, physical security upgrades, security training exercises, 17preparedness training exercises, contracting with security 18personnel, and any other security upgrades deemed eligible by 19the Director. Eligible security improvements shall not 20duplicate, in part or in whole, a project included under any 21awarded federal grant or in a pending federal application. The 22Director shall establish procedures and forms by which 23applicants may apply for a grant and procedures for 24distributing grants to recipients. Any security improvements 25awarded shall remain at the physical property listed in the 26grant application, unless authorized by Agency rule or   SB1360- 15 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1approved by the Agency in writing. The procedures shall 2require each applicant to do the following:3        (1) identify and substantiate prior or current 4    threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism against the 5    not-for-profit organization;6        (2) indicate the symbolic or strategic value of one or 7    more sites that renders the site a possible target of a 8    threat, attack, or act of terrorism;9        (3) discuss potential consequences to the organization 10    if the site is damaged, destroyed, or disrupted by a 11    threat, attack, or act of terrorism;12        (4) describe how the grant will be used to integrate 13    organizational preparedness with broader State and local 14    preparedness efforts, as described by the Agency in each 15    Notice of Opportunity for Funding;16        (5) submit (i) a vulnerability assessment conducted by 17    experienced security, law enforcement, or military 18    personnel, or conducted using an Agency-approved or 19    federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program self-assessment 20    tool, and (ii) a description of how the grant award will be 21    used to address the vulnerabilities identified in the 22    assessment; and23        (6) submit any other relevant information as may be 24    required by the Director.25    The Agency is authorized to use funds appropriated for the 26grant program described in this subsection (g-5) to administer   SB1360- 16 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1the program. Any Agency Notice of Opportunity for Funding, 2proposed or final rulemaking, guidance, training opportunity, 3or other resource related to the grant program must be 4published on the Agency's publicly available website, and any 5announcements related to funding shall be shared with all 6State legislative offices, the Governor's office, emergency 7services and disaster agencies mandated or required pursuant 8to subsections (b) through (d) of Section 10, and any other 9State agencies as determined by the Agency. Subject to 10appropriation, the grant application period shall be open for 11no less than 45 calendar days during the first application 12cycle each fiscal year, unless the Agency determines that a 13shorter period is necessary to avoid conflicts with the annual 14federal Nonprofit Security Grant Program funding cycle. 15Additional application cycles may be conducted during the same 16fiscal year, subject to availability of funds. Upon request, 17Agency staff shall provide reasonable assistance to any 18applicant in completing a grant application or meeting a 19post-award requirement. 20    In addition to any advance payment rules or procedures 21adopted by the Agency, the Agency shall adopt rules or 22procedures by which grantees under this subsection (g-5) may 23receive a working capital advance of initial start-up costs 24and up to 2 months of program expenses, not to exceed 25% of 25the total award amount, if, during the application process, 26the grantee demonstrates a need for funds to commence a   SB1360- 17 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1project. The remaining funds must be paid through 2reimbursement after the grantee presents sufficient supporting 3documentation of expenditures for eligible activities. 4    (h) Except as provided in Section 17.5 of this Act, any 5moneys received by the Agency from donations or sponsorships 6unrelated to a disaster shall be deposited in the Emergency 7Planning and Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 8appropriation, to effectuate planning and training activities. 9Any moneys received by the Agency from donations during a 10disaster and intended for disaster response or recovery shall 11be deposited into the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund and 12used for disaster response and recovery pursuant to the 13Disaster Relief Act. 14    (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency may by rule 15assess and collect reasonable fees for attendance at 16Agency-sponsored conferences to enable the Agency to carry out 17the requirements of this Act. Any moneys received under this 18subsection shall be deposited in the Emergency Planning and 19Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 20appropriation, for planning and training activities.21    (j) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 22Homeland Security is authorized to make grants to other State 23agencies, public universities, units of local government, and 24statewide mutual aid organizations to enhance statewide 25emergency preparedness and response. 26    (k) Subject to appropriation from the Emergency Planning   SB1360- 18 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1and Training Fund, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 2and Office of Homeland Security shall obtain training services 3and support for local emergency services and support for local 4emergency services and disaster agencies for training, 5exercises, and equipment related to carbon dioxide pipelines 6and sequestration, and, subject to the availability of 7funding, shall provide $5,000 per year to the Illinois Fire 8Service Institute for first responder training required under 9Section 4-615 of the Public Utilities Act. Amounts in the 10Emergency Planning and Training Fund will be used by the 11Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 12Security for administrative costs incurred in carrying out the 13requirements of this subsection. To carry out the purposes of 14this subsection, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 15Office of Homeland Security may accept moneys from all 16authorized sources into the Emergency Planning and Training 17Fund, including, but not limited to, transfers from the Carbon 18Dioxide Sequestration Administrative Fund and the Public 19Utility Fund. 20    (l) (k) The Agency shall do all other things necessary, 21incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this Act, 22including the adoption of rules in accordance with the 23Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 24    The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 25Homeland Security may make grants for the purpose of promoting 26public safety radio interoperability if the use of the funds   SB1360- 19 -LRB104 05139 RTM 15168 b1is consistent with standards set forth by the Illinois 2Statewide Interoperability Executive Committee under Section 310 of the Illinois State Police Radio Act and may adopt such 4rules as necessary to implement these grants. In awarding 5grants for the purpose of promoting public safety radio 6interoperability, priority shall be given first to public 7safety agencies with jurisdiction in areas without land mobile 8radio communication interoperability. 9(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 10102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-418, eff. 111-1-24; 103-588, eff. 1-1-25; 103-651, eff. 7-18-24; 103-999, 12eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.